District of Columbia statutes.
8-151.11

Continuity; rules and regulations.

Regulations and rules of any agency, department, administration, board, or commission, the functions of which are transferred by this chapter to DDOE and any Mayor’s order or administrative order relating to a transferred function not in conflict with this chapter shall continue in force until such time as the Mayor, or his designee, issues new rules and regulations or orders governing the subject.

History

Feb. 15, 2006, D.C. Law 16-51, § 111, 52 DCR 10812